Maryland, session 2026, HB0242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Base period” means:
– 1 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) the first 4 of the last 5 completed calendar quarters immediately
preceding the start of the benefit year; or
(2) the 4 most recently completed calendar quarters immediately preceding
the start of the benefit year only if the individual applying for benefits does not qualify for
any benefits under § 8–802 of this title using the definition in item (1) of this subsection.
(c) “Base period employer” means an employing unit who paid wages to an
individual during the base period of the individual for covered employment.
(d) “Benefit year” means a 1–year period that begins:
(1) on the 1st day of the 1st week for which an individual first files a claim
for benefits; or
(2) if an individual already has had a benefit year, on the 1st day of the 1st
week for which the individual files a claim for benefits after the termination of the
preceding benefit year.
(e) “Benefits” means the money that is payable under this title to an individual
who is unemployed.
(f) “Board of Appeals” means the Board of Appeals of the Maryland Department
of Labor established under § 8–5A–01 of this title.
(g) “Calendar quarter” means the period of 3 consecutive calendar months ending
on March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31, except as otherwise provided by the
Secretary by regulation.
(h) “Child support” means an obligation that is enforced under a plan that:
(1) is described in § 454 of the Social Security Act; and
(2) has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and
Human Services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.
(i) “Child support enforcement unit” means a unit of a state or political
subdivision of a state that operates under a plan that:
(1) is described in § 454 of the Social Security Act; and
(2) has been approved by the United States Secretary of Health and
Human Services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.
(I–1) (1) “CLAIM INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION ABOUT:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
(I) WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL IS RECEIVING, HAS RECEIVED, OR
HAS APPLIED FOR UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF COMPENSATION THE INDIVIDUAL IS
RECEIVING OR IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE; AND
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL’S CURRENT OR LAST KNOWN HOME
ADDRESS.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THE DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO A
REQUESTING AGENCY RELATED TO AN INCOME AND ELIGIBILITY VERIFICATION
SYSTEM DESCRIBED IN 20 C.F.R. PART 603, “CLAIM INFORMATION” INCLUDES:
(I) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS REFUSED AN OFFER OF
WORK AND, IF SO, A DESCRIPTION OF THE JOB OFFERED INCLUDING THE TERMS,
CONDITIONS, AND RATE OF PAY; AND
(II) ANY OTHER INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE RECORDS OF
THE DEPARTMENT THAT IS NEEDED BY THE REQUESTING AGENCY TO VERIFY
ELIGIBILITY FOR, AND THE AMOUNT OF, BENEFITS.
(j) “Claimant” means an individual who submits a claim for benefits.
(j–1) “Claims examiner” means an individual appointed by the Secretary who
makes determinations or redeterminations of claims under Subtitle 8 of this title.
(J–2) (1) “CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION”
MEANS ANY UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION IN THE RECORDS OF THE
DEPARTMENT THAT:
(I) REVEALS THE NAME OF OR OTHER IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION ABOUT AN INDIVIDUAL;
(II) REVEALS THE NAME OF OR OTHER IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION ABOUT A PAST OR PRESENT EMPLOYER OR EMPLOYING UNIT; OR
(III) COULD FORESEEABLY BE COMBINED WITH OTHER
PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION TO REVEAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION
ABOUT AN INDIVIDUAL, EMPLOYER, OR EMPLOYING UNIT.
(2) “CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION”
INCLUDES:
– 3 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) CLAIM INFORMATION; AND
(II) WAGE INFORMATION.
(k) “Contributions” means money required to be paid to the Unemployment
Insurance Fund under § 8–607 of this title.
(l) “Covered employment” means work that an individual performs for an
employing unit that is the basis for benefits.
(m) “Department” means the Maryland Department of Labor.
(m–1) “Determination” means a decision made by or on behalf of the Secretary under
this title.
(n) (1) “Educational institution” means an institution that offers participants,
students, or trainees an organized course of study or training that is academic, technical,
trade–oriented, or preparatory for gainful employment in a recognized occupation.
(2) “Educational institution” includes an institution of higher education.
(o) “Employer” means a person or governmental entity who employs at least 1
individual within the State.
(p) “Employing unit” means:
(1) an employer that has at least 1 employee engaged in covered
employment for at least part of a day;
(2) an employer that has elected to become subject to this title under §
8–203 of this title; or
(3) an employer that is not otherwise subject to this title but that:
(i) within the current or preceding calendar year, is liable for any
federal tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a
State unemployment fund; or
(ii) as a condition for approval for full credit of contributions against
the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, is required by that Act to be an
employing unit.
(q) “Governmental entity” means:
(1) a governmental unit as defined in § 1–101 of this article; or
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
(2) an instrumentality of:
(i) 1 or more states;
(ii) 1 or more political subdivisions of a state; or
(iii) 1 or more states and political subdivisions of states.
(q–1) “Hearing examiner” means an individual appointed under § 8–502 of this title
who is authorized to conduct hearings and issue decisions in cases appealed to the Lower
Appeals Division.
(r) “Hospital” has the meaning stated in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article.
(s) (1) “Institution of higher education” means an educational institution that:
(i) is a public or other nonprofit institution;
(ii) is authorized to provide in the State a program of education
beyond high school; and
(iii) admits as regular students only individuals with a certificate of
graduation from high school or a recognized equivalent certificate for:
1. training preparatory for employment in a recognized
occupation;
2. work for credit toward a bachelor’s degree; or
3. postgraduate or postdoctoral study.
(2) “Institution of higher education” includes each college and university in
the State.
(t) “Knowingly” means, except as otherwise provided in this title, having actual
knowledge, deliberate ignorance, or reckless disregard for the truth.
(t–1) “Last known address” includes a physical address or an electronic address.
(u) “Lower Appeals Division” means the Lower Appeals Division of the Maryland
Department of Labor.
(u–1) “Mailed or otherwise delivered” means to cause to be delivered by electronic
transmission or physical mailing.
(v) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization that is:
– 5 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) exempt from income tax under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(w) “Part–time worker” means an individual:
(1) whose availability for work is restricted to part–time work; and
(2) who worked at least 20 hours per week in part–time work for a majority
of the weeks of work in the base period.
(W–1) (1) “PERFORMANCE OF OFFICIAL DUTIES” MEANS:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION OR ENFORCEMENT OF LAW,
INCLUDING RESEARCH RELATED TO THE LAW ADMINISTERED BY A PUBLIC
OFFICIAL; OR
(II) THE EXECUTION OF THE OFFICIAL RESPONSIBILITIES OF A
FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(2) WITH RESPECT TO A PUBLIC OFFICIAL DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (W–3)(2), (3), (4), OR (5) OF THIS SECTION, “PERFORMANCE OF
OFFICIAL DUTIES” INCLUDES, IN ADDITION TO THE ACTIVITIES SET OUT IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE USE OF CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION FOR THE FOLLOWING LIMITED PURPOSES:
(I) STATE AND LOCAL PERFORMANCE ACCOUNTABILITY
UNDER THE FEDERAL WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY ACT,
INCLUDING ELIGIBLE TRAINING PROVIDER PERFORMANCE ACCOUNTABILITY
UNDER §§ 116(D) AND 122;
(II) TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF DISCRETIONARY
FEDERAL GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THE FEDERAL WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND
OPPORTUNITY ACT; OR
(III) AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED FOR EDUCATION OR WORKFORCE
TRAINING PROGRAM PERFORMANCE ACCOUNTABILITY AND REPORTING UNDER
FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
“PERFORMANCE OF OFFICIAL DUTIES” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE SOLICITATION OF
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
CONTRIBUTIONS OR EXPENDITURES TO OR ON BEHALF OF A CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC
OR POLITICAL OFFICE OR A POLITICAL PARTY.
(W–2) “PUBLIC DOMAIN INFORMATION” MEANS:
(1) INFORMATION ABOUT THE ORGANIZATION OF THE DEPARTMENT,
INCLUDING THE LOWER APPEALS DIVISION AND THE BOARD OF APPEALS;
(2) INFORMATION ABOUT APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS,
RULES, REGULATIONS, AND INTERPRETATIONS OF THE LAWS, RULES, AND
REGULATIONS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS OF GENERAL POLICY AND
INTERPRETATIONS OF GENERAL APPLICABILITY; AND
(3) AN AGREEMENT OF ANY KIND OR NATURE, INCLUDING
INTERSTATE ARRANGEMENTS, RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS, AND ANY AGREEMENT
WITH THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR OR THE SECRETARY, RELATING TO THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM.
(W–3) “PUBLIC OFFICIAL” MEANS:
(1) AN OFFICIAL, AN AGENCY, OR A PUBLIC ENTITY WITHIN THE
EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT HAS
RESPONSIBILITY FOR ADMINISTERING OR ENFORCING A LAW, OR AN ELECTED
OFFICIAL IN THE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(2) PUBLIC POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS
ESTABLISHED AND GOVERNED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE, INCLUDING:
(I) INSTITUTIONS THAT ARE PART OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
OF STATE GOVERNMENT;
(II) INSTITUTIONS THAT ARE INDEPENDENT OF THE EXECUTIVE
BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH 20 C.F.R. § 603.2(D)(2)(II);
AND
(III) PUBLICLY GOVERNED AND FUNDED COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES;
(3) PERFORMANCE ACCOUNTABILITY AND CUSTOMER INFORMATION
AGENCIES DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNOR TO BE RESPONSIBLE FOR
COORDINATING THE ASSESSMENT OF STATE AND LOCAL EDUCATION OR
WORKFORCE TRAINING PROGRAM PERFORMANCE OR EVALUATING EDUCATION OR
WORKFORCE TRAINING PROVIDER PERFORMANCE;
– 7 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) THE CHIEF ELECTED OFFICIAL OF A LOCAL AREA AS DEFINED IN §
3(9) OF THE FEDERAL WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY ACT; AND
(5) A STATE EDUCATIONAL AUTHORITY, AGENCY, OR INSTITUTION AS
THOSE TERMS ARE USED IN THE FEDERAL FAMILY EDUCATIONAL RIGHTS AND
PRIVACY ACT, TO THE EXTENT THAT THEY ARE PUBLIC ENTITIES.
(W–4) “REQUESTING AGENCY” MEANS AN AGENCY DEFINED IN 20 C.F.R. §
603.21.
[(w–1)] (W–5) “Review determination” means the process by which the
Department conducts an internal review of a determination made under Subtitle 6 of this
title, independent of a determination or redetermination of a claim.
[(w–2)] (W–6) “Review determination decision” means the Secretary’s final
determination under Subtitle 6 of this title for which a right to a review determination is
available that:
(1) is issued in accordance with § 8–604 of this title; and
(2) may be appealed in accordance with § 8–605 of this title.
(x) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Labor.
(x–1) “Send” means to cause to be delivered by electronic transmission or physical
mailing.
(y) (1) “State” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of this article.
(2) “State” does not include a territory of the United States unless the
territory enacted an unemployment insurance law that complies with the standards
adopted by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under the Federal Unemployment
Tax Act or Title III of the Social Security Act.
(z) “Tip” means compensation that:
(1) an individual receives from a customer of the individual’s employer
while performing covered employment; and
(2) is included in a written statement provided to the employer under §
6053(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(Z–1) (1) “UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION” MEANS
INFORMATION IN THE DEPARTMENT’S RECORDS PERTAINING TO THE
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
ADMINISTRATION OF THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM, INCLUDING
INFORMATION OBTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT FROM CLAIMANTS AND EMPLOYERS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(2) “UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION” INCLUDES STATE
WAGE REPORTS COLLECTED UNDER AN INCOME AND ELIGIBILITY VERIFICATION
SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH 42 U.S.C. § 1320B–7 THAT ARE OBTAINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT FOR DETERMINING UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE MONETARY
ELIGIBILITY OR ARE DOWNLOADED TO THE DEPARTMENT’S FILES AS A RESULT OF A
CROSSMATCH BUT DOES NOT OTHERWISE INCLUDE THOSE WAGE REPORTS.
(3) “UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION” DOES NOT
INCLUDE:
(I) INFORMATION IN THE STATE’S DIRECTORY OF NEW HIRES,
UNLESS THE INFORMATION HAS BEEN DISCLOSED TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR USE IN
THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM; OR
(II) THE PERSONNEL OR FISCAL INFORMATION OF THE
DEPARTMENT.
(Z–2) “WAGE INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION IN THE RECORDS OF THE
DEPARTMENT ABOUT:
(1) THE WAGES PAID TO AN INDIVIDUAL;
(2) THE SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OF THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(3) THE NAME, ADDRESS, STATE, AND FEDERAL EMPLOYER
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE EMPLOYER WHO PAID WAGES TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
(aa) (1) “Wages” means all compensation for personal services except as
provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(2) “Wages” includes:
(i) a bonus;
(ii) a commission;
(iii) a tip; and
(iv) the cash value of all compensation in any medium other than
cash.
– 9 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “Wages” does not include:
(i) the amount of any payment made to or on behalf of an employee
or any dependent of an employee under a plan or system established by an employing unit
that provides for employees generally or for their dependents or for a class of employees
and their dependents on account of:
1. retirement;
2. sickness or accident disability payments under a workers’
compensation law;
3. medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with
sickness or accident disability;
4. a cafeteria plan as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 125, if the
payments would not be treated as wages outside a cafeteria plan;
5. dependent care assistance to the extent that the
assistance payments would be excludable from gross income under the provisions of 26
U.S.C. § 127 or § 129; or
6. death;
(ii) any amount that an employing unit pays for insurance or an
annuity or into a fund to provide for a payment described in item (i) of this paragraph;
(iii) any payment on account of sickness or accident disability or
medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability made
by the employing unit to or on behalf of an employee at least 6 calendar months after the
last calendar month in which the employee worked for the employing unit;
(iv) any payment made to or on behalf of an employee or beneficiary
of the employee:
1. from or to a trust exempt from tax under § 401(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code at the time of the payment, unless the payment is made to an
employee of the trust as compensation for services rendered as an employee and not as
beneficiary of the trust; or
2. under or to an annuity plan that, at the time of payment,
meets the requirements of § 401(a)(3) through (6) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(v) with respect to compensation paid to an employee for domestic
service in a private home of the employing unit or for agricultural labor, the payment by
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
an employing unit without deduction of the tax imposed on an employee under § 3101 of
the Internal Revenue Code;
(vi) any payment required from an employee under a state
unemployment insurance law;
(vii) compensation paid in any medium other than cash to an
employee for service not in the course of the trade or business of the employing unit;
(viii) any payment other than vacation or sick pay made to an
employee after the month in which the employee becomes 65 years old if the employee did
not work for the employing unit in the period for which the payment is made;
(ix) any payment, including an amount paid into a fund to provide
for any payment by an employing unit to or on behalf of an employee under a plan or system
that an employing unit establishes that provides for employees of the employing unit
generally or a class or group of employees to supplement unemployment benefits;
(x) any payment to an individual as compensation for serving or
being called to serve on a jury; or
(xi) any payment to an individual as allowance or reimbursement for
travel or other expenses incurred on the business of the employer up to the amount of
expenses actually incurred and accounted for by the individual to the employer.
(bb) “Week” means a period of 7 consecutive days, as the Secretary sets by
regulation.
8–110.
(a) [On] SUBJECT TO FEDERAL LAW, INCLUDING 20 C.F.R. PART 603, ON
request and for purposes consistent with Chapter 65 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2021, the Department shall provide to the chief elected official of a county demographic
data and the addresses, occupations, and last known employers of unemployment
insurance recipients who live in the county of the chief elected official.
(b) [A] SUBJECT TO FEDERAL LAW, INCLUDING 20 C.F.R. PART 603, A chief
elected official of a county may:
(1) share the information provided to the chief elected official under
subsection (a) of this section with the governing body of the county; and
(2) request information under subsection (a) of this section on behalf of a
political subdivision within the county and provide the information to the political
subdivision.
– 11 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The Secretary may adopt regulations to carry out this section, including
regulations that:
(1) establish the circumstances under which the names of unemployment
insurance recipients may be included in the information provided under subsection (a) of
this section; and
(2) are necessary to protect the personally identifiable information of
unemployment insurance recipients.
8–111.
(A) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, “FEDERAL LAW” MEANS THE
FEDERAL LAW GOVERNING THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING THE SOCIAL SECURITY ACT, THE FEDERAL UNEMPLOYMENT TAX ACT,
AND RELATED REGULATIONS PROMULGATED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR,
INCLUDING 20 C.F.R. PART 603.
(B) THE CONFIDENTIALITY PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE
INTERPRETED IN A MANNER THAT ENSURES COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW,
ANY UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION IN THE DEPARTMENT’S RECORDS
THAT REVEALS THE NAME OR OTHER IDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT AN
INDIVIDUAL OR A PAST OR PRESENT EMPLOYER OR EMPLOYING UNIT, OR THAT
COULD FORESEEABLY BE COMBINED WITH OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
INFORMATION TO REVEAL ANY SUCH INFORMATION, IS CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY NOT
BE DISCLOSED.
(D) THE CONFIDENTIALITY PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE DO NOT APPLY TO:
(1) THE DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION THAT IS NECESSARY FOR THE
PROPER ADMINISTRATION OF THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING THE DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO A CLAIMANT AND EMPLOYER
RELATED TO A CLAIM FOR BENEFITS INVOLVING THAT CLAIMANT AND THAT
EMPLOYER;
(2) PUBLIC DOMAIN INFORMATION; OR
(3) INFORMATION COLLECTED EXCLUSIVELY FOR STATISTICAL
PURPOSES UNDER A COOPERATIVE AGREEMENT WITH THE U.S. BUREAU OF LABOR
STATISTICS, ANY OTHER INFORMATION TRANSFERRED TO THE U.S. BUREAU OF
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
LABOR STATISTICS UNDER AN AGREEMENT, OR THE U.S. BUREAU OF LABOR
STATISTICS’ DISCLOSURE OR USE OF SUCH INFORMATION.
(E) THE SECRETARY SHALL DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION:
(1) AS NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER ADMINISTRATION OF THE
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM, INCLUDING DISCLOSING INFORMATION TO
A CLAIMANT AND EMPLOYER RELATED TO A CLAIM FOR BENEFITS INVOLVING THAT
CLAIMANT AND THAT EMPLOYER;
(2) AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, INCLUDING 20
C.F.R. §§ 603.6(B) AND 603.22; AND
(3) AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED UNDER THIS TITLE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH FEDERAL LAW.
(F) TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY FOR PROPER PRESENTATION OF A CLAIM,
THE SECRETARY, THE LOWER APPEALS DIVISION, AND THE BOARD OF APPEALS
SHALL PROVIDE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION TO A
CLAIMANT OR AN EMPLOYER AT A HEARING BEFORE A HEARING EXAMINER, A
SPECIAL EXAMINER, THE SECRETARY, OR THE BOARD OF APPEALS PERTAINING TO
THAT CLAIMANT AND THAT EMPLOYER.
(G) AT THE SECRETARY’S DISCRETION, AND IF THE DISCLOSURE DOES NOT
INTERFERE WITH THE EFFICIENT ADMINISTRATION OF THE UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE PROGRAM, THE SECRETARY MAY AUTHORIZE THE FOLLOWING
DISCLOSURES OF CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW:
(1) FOR PURPOSES NOT RELATED TO THE UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE PROGRAM, INFORMATION ABOUT AN INDIVIDUAL TO THE INDIVIDUAL,
OR ABOUT AN EMPLOYER TO THE EMPLOYER;
(2) FINAL DECISIONS, AND RECORDS OF HEARINGS THAT LED TO
FINAL DECISIONS, OF THE LOWER APPEALS DIVISION AND THE BOARD OF
APPEALS, IF ALL SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS HAVE BEEN REMOVED;
(3) TO A PUBLIC OFFICIAL FOR USE IN THE PERFORMANCE OF
OFFICIAL DUTIES;
(4) TO AN AGENT OR CONTRACTOR OF A PUBLIC OFFICIAL FOR USE IN
THE PERFORMANCE OF THE PUBLIC OFFICIAL’S OFFICIAL DUTIES, IF THE PUBLIC
– 13 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OFFICIAL RETAINS RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE USES OF THE CONFIDENTIAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION BY THE AGENT OR CONTRACTOR;
(5) TO AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE, OTHER THAN AN
ATTORNEY, OF A CLAIMANT OR AN EMPLOYER IF THE AUTHORIZED
REPRESENTATIVE PRESENTS A WRITTEN RELEASE FROM THE CLAIMANT OR
EMPLOYER BEING REPRESENTED;
(6) TO AN ELECTED OFFICIAL PERFORMING CONSTITUENT SERVICES,
IF THE OFFICIAL PRESENTS REASONABLE EVIDENCE, SUCH AS A LETTER FROM THE
INDIVIDUAL OR EMPLOYER REQUESTING ASSISTANCE OR A WRITTEN RECORD OF A
TELEPHONE REQUEST FROM THE INDIVIDUAL OR EMPLOYER, THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
OR EMPLOYER HAS AUTHORIZED THE DISCLOSURE;
(7) TO AN ATTORNEY WHO IS REPRESENTING A CLAIMANT OR AN
EMPLOYER IN AN UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE CLAIM; AND
(8) TO A THIRD PARTY THAT IS NOT ACTING AS AN AGENT OR THAT
RECEIVES CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION FOLLOWING
AN INFORMED CONSENT DISCLOSURE ON AN ONGOING BASIS, EVEN IF THE
INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY IS AN AGENT, BUT ONLY IF:
(I) THE THIRD PARTY OBTAINS A WRITTEN RELEASE FROM THE
INDIVIDUAL OR EMPLOYER TO WHOM THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION PERTAINS;
(II) THE WRITTEN RELEASE IS SIGNED AND INCLUDES:
1. A STATEMENT SPECIFICALLY IDENTIFYING:
A. THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
INFORMATION TO BE DISCLOSED;
B. THAT STATE GOVERNMENT FILES WILL BE ACCESSED
TO OBTAIN THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION; AND
C. THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION IS SOUGHT; AND
2. A STATEMENT THAT CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION OBTAINED UNDER THE RELEASE WILL BE USED ONLY
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
FOR THAT PURPOSE AND IDENTIFYING ALL PARTIES WHO MAY RECEIVE THE
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION DISCLOSED; AND
(III) THE PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN THE RELEASE IS LIMITED TO
PROVIDING A SERVICE OR BENEFIT TO THE INDIVIDUAL SIGNING THE RELEASE
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL EXPECTS TO RECEIVE AS A RESULT OF SIGNING THE RELEASE
OR CARRYING OUT ADMINISTRATION OR EVALUATION OF A PUBLIC PROGRAM TO
WHICH THE RELEASE PERTAINS.
(H) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION IN RESPONSE TO A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY A LOCAL,
STATE, OR FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL, OTHER THAN A CLERK OF COURT ON
BEHALF OF A LITIGANT, WITH AUTHORITY TO OBTAIN THE CONFIDENTIAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION BY SUBPOENA UNDER FEDERAL OR
STATE LAW.
(2) THE SECRETARY MAY CHOOSE TO PROVIDE THE CONFIDENTIAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION TO AN OFFICIAL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION WITHOUT THE ACTUAL ISSUANCE OF A SUBPOENA.
(I) CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION
DISCLOSED TO A THIRD PARTY THAT IS NOT ACTING AS AN AGENT OR THAT RECEIVES
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION FOLLOWING AN
INFORMED CONSENT DISCLOSURE ON AN ONGOING BASIS, EVEN IF THE INDIVIDUAL
OR ENTITY IS AN AGENT, TO A PUBLIC OFFICIAL, TO AN AGENT OR CONTRACTOR OF
A PUBLIC OFFICIAL, TO A REQUESTING AGENCY AND AS REQUIRED UNDER 20 C.F.R.
§ 603.6(B)(1) THROUGH (4), (6), AND (7)(I), SHALL BE SAFEGUARDED AGAINST
UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE RECIPIENT SHALL USE THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH IT WAS
DISCLOSED AND CONSISTENT WITH A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT;
(2) THE RECIPIENT SHALL STORE AND PROCESS THE CONFIDENTIAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION ELECTRONICALLY AND PHYSICALLY IN
SUCH A WAY TO ENSURE THAT IT IS SECURE FROM ACCESS BY UNAUTHORIZED
PERSONS BY ANY MEANS;
(3) THE RECIPIENT SHALL UNDERTAKE PRECAUTIONS TO ENSURE
THAT ONLY AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL, INCLUDING EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND
CONTRACTORS, ARE GIVEN ACCESS TO DISCLOSED CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION STORED IN COMPUTER SYSTEMS;
– 15 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) THE RECIPIENT SHALL INSTRUCT ALL PERSONNEL, INCLUDING
ANY EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND CONTRACTORS, HAVING ACCESS TO THE DISCLOSED
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION ABOUT THE
CONFIDENTIAL NATURE OF THE INFORMATION, THE CONFIDENTIALITY
REQUIREMENTS OF FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, AND THE SANCTIONS UNDER STATE
LAW FOR UNAUTHORIZED DISCLOSURE OF THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION;
(5) THE RECIPIENT SHALL SIGN AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT THAT ALL
PERSONNEL, INCLUDING ANY EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND CONTRACTORS, HAVING
ACCESS TO THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION HAVE
BEEN INSTRUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, WILL ADHERE TO THE
STATE’S CONFIDENTIALITY REQUIREMENTS AND PROCEDURES, AND AGREE TO
REPORT ANY INFRACTION OF THESE REQUIREMENTS TO THE DEPARTMENT FULLY
AND PROMPTLY;
(6) (I) THE RECIPIENT SHALL DISPOSE OF CONFIDENTIAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION DISCLOSED OR OBTAINED, AND ANY
COPIES OF THE DISCLOSED OR OBTAINED CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION MADE BY THE RECIPIENT, INCLUDING BY EMPLOYEES,
AGENTS, AND CONTRACTORS, AFTER THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE CONFIDENTIAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION IS DISCLOSED IS SERVED, EXCEPT FOR
DISCLOSED CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION POSSESSED
BY ANY COURT; AND
(II) THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
INFORMATION DISCLOSED MAY NOT BE RETAINED WITH PERSONAL IDENTIFIERS
FOR LONGER THAN THE PERIOD OF TIME AS THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS
APPROPRIATE ON A CASE–BY–CASE BASIS;
(7) THE RECIPIENT SHALL MAINTAIN A SYSTEM SUFFICIENT TO
ALLOW AN AUDIT OF COMPLIANCE BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(8) THE RECIPIENT, AND ANY OF ITS EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND
CONTRACTORS, MAY NOT REDISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
INFORMATION EXCEPT AS SPECIFICALLY AUTHORIZED BY THE SECRETARY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A WRITTEN AGREEMENT.
(J) IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW, THE SECRETARY MAY AUTHORIZE
A RECIPIENT OF CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION UNDER
20 C.F.R. § 603.6(B)(1), (2), (3), (4), (6), OR (7)(I), 20 C.F.R. § 603.22, OR
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
SUBSECTION (G)(3), (4), OR (8) OF THIS SECTION TO REDISCLOSE THE
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION ONLY:
(1) TO THE INDIVIDUAL OR EMPLOYER WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF THE
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION;
(2) TO AN ATTORNEY OR OTHER DULY AUTHORIZED AGENT
REPRESENTING THE INDIVIDUAL OR EMPLOYER;
(3) IN ANY ADMINISTRATIVE, CIVIL, OR CRIMINAL PROCEEDINGS FOR
OR ON BEHALF OF A RECIPIENT AGENCY OR ENTITY;
(4) IN RESPONSE TO A SUBPOENA ONLY AS PROVIDED IN 20 C.F.R. §
603.7;
(5) TO AN AGENT OR CONTRACTOR OF A PUBLIC OFFICIAL IF:
(I) THE PERSON REDISCLOSING IS A PUBLIC OFFICIAL;
(II) THE PUBLIC OFFICIAL RETAINS RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE
USES OF THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION BY THE
AGENT OR CONTRACTOR; AND
(III) THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
INFORMATION REDISCLOSED IS SUBJECT TO THE SAFEGUARDS IN SUBSECTION (I)
OF THIS SECTION;
(6) FROM ONE PUBLIC OFFICIAL TO ANOTHER IF THE INFORMATION
REDISCLOSED IS SUBJECT TO THE SAFEGUARDS IN SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS
SECTION;
(7) TO ANY AGENT OF A CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT UNIT IF:
(I) THE AGENT IS UNDER CONTRACT WITH THE UNIT FOR THE
PURPOSES OF ESTABLISHING AND COLLECTING CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATIONS
FROM AND LOCATING INDIVIDUALS OWING SUCH OBLIGATIONS; AND
(II) THE AGENT COMPLIES WITH THE SAFEGUARDS IN
SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(8) WHEN SPECIFICALLY AUTHORIZED BY A WRITTEN RELEASE THAT
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (G)(8) OF THIS SECTION.
– 17 –

Ch. 129 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(K) ANY EMPLOYEE OR FORMER EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT, AND ANY
RECIPIENT OF CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING ANY EMPLOYEE, AGENT, OR
CONTRACTOR OF THE RECIPIENT, WHO DISCLOSES CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION IN VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE IS SUBJECT TO PENALTIES
UNDER SUBTITLE 13 OF THIS TITLE.
8–625.
[(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Secretary
and Board of Appeals may not publish or allow public inspection of information obtained
under this section in any manner that reveals the identity of the employer except to public
employees in the performance of their public duties.
(2) (i) The Secretary and Board of Appeals may allow inspection of
information obtained under this section to any agent of a child support enforcement unit if
the agent is under contract with the unit for the purposes of establishing and collecting
child support obligations from and locating individuals owing such obligations.
(ii) The agent of the unit shall comply with safeguards established
by the United States Department of Labor and the Secretary and is subject to the penalties
under § 8–1305(c) of this title.
(3) To the extent necessary for proper presentation of a claim, the Secretary
or Board of Appeals shall provide information from the records to a claimant at a hearing
before a special examiner, hearing examiner, the Secretary, or the Board of Appeals.]
[8–811.
(a) In this section, “claim information” means information regarding:
(1) whether an individual is receiving, has received, or has applied for
benefits under this title;
(2) the amount of benefits an individual is receiving or is entitled to receive;
(3) an individual’s current or most recent home address;
(4) whether an individual has refused an offer of work and if so, a
description of the job offered, including terms, conditions, and rate of pay; and
(5) any other information that is needed by the child support enforcement
unit to verify eligibility for and the amount of benefits.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 129
(b) If an agent of a child support enforcement unit is under contract with the child
support enforcement unit for the purposes of establishing and collecting child support
obligations from and locating individuals owing such obligations, the Secretary and the
Board of Appeals may allow the agent to inspect claim information.
(c) The agent of the child support enforcement unit shall comply with safeguards
established by the United States Department of Labor and the Secretary and is subject to
the penalties under § 8–1305(c) of this title.]
8–1305.
(c) (1) An employing unit or officer or agent of an employing unit who violates
§ 8–1303 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine
not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or both.
(2) A person who violates § 8–5A–08(b) or (d) of this title is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment
not exceeding 1 year or both.
(3) A person who violates § 8–1304 of this subtitle is guilty of a
misdemeanor for each day the violation continues and on conviction is subject to a fine not
exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or both.
(4) An employee OR FORMER EMPLOYEE of the [Secretary or Board of
Appeals] DEPARTMENT who IN THE COURSE OF EMPLOYMENT OR DUTY HAS OR HAD
ACCESS TO CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION
MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND WHO violates [§ 8–625] § 8–111 of this title is
guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or
imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or both.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT
INSURANCE INFORMATION UNDER THIS TITLE AND WHO REDISCLOSES, WITHOUT
AUTHORIZATION, OR USES THE CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
INFORMATION FOR A PURPOSE OTHER THAN THAT SPECIFIED IN THE PROVISION OF
LAW OR AGREEMENT AUTHORIZING THE USE OR DISCLOSURE OF THE
CONFIDENTIAL UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE INFORMATION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000
OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 19 –